Utah statutes.
35A-3-111.   Collection of overpayments.
(1)  The department is responsible for the recovery of overpayments required
in Section 35A-3-603.
(2)  Excess property liens required in the various programs not transferred to
the federal government shall remain a condition of eligibility in public
assistance programs.
(3)  A client can appeal an initial department determination that there has
been an overpayment under rules made by the department in accordance with
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
